Utah statutes.
72-10-110.   Aircraft registration information requirements -- Registration
fee -- Administration -- Partial year registration.
(1)  All applications for aircraft registration shall contain:
(a)  a description of the aircraft, including:
(i)  the manufacturer or builder;
(ii)  the aircraft registration number, type, year of manufacture, or if an
experimental aircraft, the year the aircraft was completed and certified for
air worthiness by an inspector of the Federal Aviation Administration; and
(iii)  gross weight;
(b)  the name and address of the owner of the aircraft; and
(c)  where the aircraft is located, or the address where the aircraft is
usually used or based.
(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), at the time application is made
for registration or renewal of registration of an aircraft under this chapter,
an annual registration fee of 0.4% of the average wholesale value of the
aircraft shall be paid.
(b)  For purposes of calculating the value of the aircraft under Subsection
(2)(a) or (3)(d), the Tax Commission shall use the average wholesale value as
stated in the Aircraft Bluebook Price Digest.
(3) (a)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2), the following aircraft shall pay an
annual registration fee of $100:
(i)  an aircraft not listed in the Aircraft Bluebook Price Digest; or
(ii)  an experimental aircraft.
(b) Notwithstanding Subsection (2), an aircraft 50 years or older shall pay
the lesser of:
(i)  $100; or
(ii)  the uniform fee provided for under Subsection (2)(a).
(c) Notwithstanding Subsection (2), an aircraft that does not have a valid
airworthiness certificate for a period of six months or more:
(i)  may not apply for a certificate of registration required under Section
72-10-109; and
(ii)  is exempt from paying a registration fee until the aircraft has a valid
airworthiness certificate.
(d)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2), an aircraft shall pay an annual
registration fee of .25% of the average wholesale value of the aircraft if:
(i)  used by an air charter service for air charter; and
(ii)  owned by a person other than the air charter service.
(4) (a)  The Tax Commission shall provide a registration card to an owner of
an aircraft if:
(i)  the owner complies with the registration requirements of this section;
and
(ii)  the owner of the aircraft states that the aircraft has a valid
airworthiness certificate.
(b)  An owner of an aircraft shall carry the registration card in the
registered aircraft.
(5)  The registration fees assessed under this chapter shall be collected by
the Tax Commission to be distributed as provided in Subsection (6).
(6)  After deducting the costs of administering all aircraft registrations
under this chapter, the Tax Commission shall deposit all remaining aircraft
registration fees in the Aeronautics Restricted Account created by Section
72-2-126.
(7)  Aircraft which are registered under this chapter for less than a full
calendar year shall be charged a registration fee which is reduced in
proportion to the fraction of the calendar year during which the aircraft is
registered in this state.
(8) (a)  The Utah Division of Aeronautics shall maintain a statewide database
of all aircraft based within the state.
(b)  On or before October 1 of each year, the Utah Division of Aeronautics
shall provide the Tax Commission with the data the Tax Commission requires
from the database described in Subsection (8)(a).
(c)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commission may by rule define the contents of the database described
in Subsection (8)(a).
(9)  The Tax Commission may suspend or revoke a registration if it determines
that the required fee has not been paid and the fee is not paid upon
reasonable notice and demand.
